Utah statutes.
20A-16-501.   Use of voter's email address.

(1)  An election officer shall request an email address from each covered voter who registers to vote after January 1, 2012.

(2)  An email address provided by a covered voter:

(a)  is a private record under Section 63G-2-302; and

(b)  may be used only for official communication with the covered voter about the voting process, including transmitting military-overseas ballots and election materials if the voter has requested electronic transmission, and verifying the voter's mailing address and physical location.

(3)  The request for an email address shall:

(a)  describe the purposes for which the email address may be used; and

(b)  include a statement that any other use or disclosure of the email address is prohibited.

(4) (a)  A covered voter who provides an email address may request that the covered voter's application for a military-overseas ballot be considered a standing request for electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections held through December 31 of the year following the calendar year of the date of the application or another shorter period the covered voter specifies.

(b)  An election official shall provide a military-overseas ballot to a covered voter who makes a standing request for each election to which the request is applicable.

(c)  A covered voter who is entitled to receive a military-overseas ballot for a primary election under this Subsection (4) is entitled to receive a military-overseas ballot for the general election.



Enacted by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

